Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2857
Temporary educational permit; issuance; when.

Before any temporary educational permit is issued pursuant to the Pharmacy Practice Act, the department, with the recommendation of the board, shall determine that the applicant for such permit has met all of the requirements of the act relating to issuing any such permit.

Laws 1978, LB 675, § 8;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 459;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 120;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.24;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 953.